Arkansas, session 2025, HB1005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-60-214(a), concerning the eligibility
requirements for tuition benefits for soldiers and airmen of the Arkansas
National Guard, is amended to read as follows:
(a) A soldier or airman of the Arkansas National Guard may attend a
state-supported institution of higher education tuition-free if the soldier
or airman:
(1) Is an Arkansas resident or is eligible for in-state tuition
under § 6-60-205;
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (f)(3) of this section,
has completed initial active duty training;
(3) Except as provided in subsection (f) of this section, is in
good standing as an active soldier or airman of the Arkansas National Guard;
*CRH013*
11/20/2024 8:09:06 AM CRH013

HB1005
(4) Has been accepted to and is enrolled in a state-supported
institution of higher education as a student in good standing;
(5) Completed and submitted to the United States Department of
Education a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA);
(6) Submitted applications for:
(A) Federal and state grants and scholarships for which
the soldier or airman is eligible; and
(B) Grants and scholarships awarded by the state-supported
institution of higher education in which the soldier or airman is enrolled;
(7) Is enrolled in a program of study leading to an
undergraduate degree or a postsecondary credential or certificate; and
(8) Has not received a bachelor's degree.
























11/20/2024 8:09:06 AM